Utah, session 2026, HB595.
Section 1. Section 79-5-601 is enacted to read:6. State Trails79-5-601. Definitions.(1)"Application" means a written application that a person submits to the division to nominate an existing recreational trail located on public land for designation as a state trail.(2)"Committee" means:(a)if the Legislature is not in session, the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee; or(b)if the Legislature is in session, the House or Senate Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Committee.(3)"Public land" means land owned or managed by a state or federal entity.(4)"State trail" means a recreational trail:(a)located on public land;(b)confined to the smallest area compatible with proper care and management of the recreational trail; and(c)designated in accordance with this part.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 79-5-602 is enacted to read:79-5-602. Application for state trail -- Division duties -- Committee duties -- Rulemaking.(1)A person may submit an application to the division to designate a state trail.(2)If the division receives a completed application described in Subsection (1), the division shall:(a)evaluate the application;(b)submit the completed application and the results of the division's evaluation to the following entities or individuals for review, as applicable:(i)the Utah Outdoor Recreation Infrastructure Advisory Committee created in Section 79-7-206;(ii)the legislative body of a county that contains some portion of the proposed state trail within the county's geographic borders;(iii)the legislative body of a municipality that contains some portion of the proposed state trail within the municipality's geographic borders;(iv)each legislator whose legislative district is located within the geographic borders of the proposed state trail; and(v)a state agency if the proposed state trail is located within the jurisdictional boundaries of the state agency; and(c)provide a written report to a committee that includes:(i)the results of the division's evaluation described in Subsection (2)(a); and(ii)any resolution or comment the division received from an entity or individual described in Subsection (2)(b).(3)The division may:(a)evaluate private and federal land with the potential to be purchased by, transferred to, or leased to the state for potential designation as a state trail; and(b)enter into negotiations with a relevant federal agency or private entity to pursue the transfer, sale, or lease of private or federal land for the proposed state trail, as appropriations allow.(4)Except as provided in Subsection (5), after reviewing a report described in Subsection (2)(c), a committee may:(a)recommend that the Legislature and governor approve the proposed state trail in accordance with Section 79-5-603; or(b)return the report to the division for further study and evaluation.(5)A committee may not recommend a proposed state trail to the Legislature if:(a)a county or municipality described in Subsection (2)(b)(ii) or (iii) adopts a resolution opposing the proposed state trail; or(b)designating the state trail may cause a state agency to breach a fiduciary, contractual, or other legal obligation governing management or use of land that is included within the geographic borders of the proposed state trail.(6)The division may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:(a)to establish the process for the submission of an application described in Subsection (1); and(b)for the administration of a state trail, subject to valid existing rights and Section 79-5-604.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 79-5-603 is enacted to read:79-5-603. Designation.(1)The Legislature and the governor shall designate a state trail through concurrent resolution.(2)Notwithstanding the requirements described in Section 79-5-602, the Legislature and governor may act under this section to designate a state trail.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 79-5-604 is enacted to read:79-5-604. Management of state trails.(1)(a)Subject to Subsection (2), the division is responsible for the management of a state trail.(b)The division may contract with another agency or entity for management services related to the management of a state trail.(2)Upon Title 63L, Chapter 8, Utah Public Land Management Act, taking effect as described in Section 63L-8-602, the government entity responsible for management of the public lands is responsible for the management of a state trail.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.